deps/stemmers/algorithms/malaya.sbl
// Malay Language Stemmer (Bahasa Melayu) for Snowball
//
// Based on: Khan et al., "Malay Language Stemmer", IJREST 2017.
//
// Algorithm (applied in order):
//   1. Strip extra suffix "-nya" (possessive/determiner clitic)
//   2. Strip one prefix  (longest match)
//   3. Strip one suffix  (longest match)
//
// The algirithm does not remove infixes, duplications (e.g.
// for plurals) and does not use a dictionary for disambiguation.

routines (
    strip_nya
    strip_prefix
    strip_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

stringescapes {}

backwardmode (

    // Remove the clitic "-nya".
    //
    // Only when the remaining stem would be >= 3 characters.
    // 'test hop 3' verifies that at least 3 characters remain between
    // the cursor and the limit after the match.
    define strip_nya as (
        [substring] among (
            'nya'
        )
        test hop 3
        delete
    )

    // Remove one suffix (longest match, stem >= 2).
    //
    // Only attempted when the current string is at least 5 characters.
    define strip_suffix as (
        $(len >= 5)
        [substring] among (
            'wati'
            'kan' 'kah' 'lah' 'pun' 'man' 'wan' 'ita'
            'an'  'ku'  'mu'
            'i'
        )
        test hop 2
        delete
    )
)

// Remove one prefix (longest match, stem >= 2).
define strip_prefix as (
    [substring] among (
        'diper'
        'penye' 'menye' 'menge' 'penge'
        'peny'  'meny'  'meng'  'peng'
        'ber'   'bel'   'per'   'ter'   'mem' 'men' 'pen' 'pem'
        'me'    'pe'    'be'    'ke'    'se'  'te'  'di'
    )
    test hop 2
    delete
)

define stem as (
    backwards do strip_nya
    do strip_prefix
    backwards do strip_suffix
)
